Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-113
Felon of other states; disqualified as juror or officeholder; right to vote.

Any person who has been convicted of a felony under the laws of any other state shall be deemed incompetent to be a juror or to hold any office of honor, trust, or profit within this state unless such person has been restored to civil rights under the laws of the state in which the felony was committed.

Any person who has been convicted of a felony under the laws of any other state is not qualified to vote until such person has completed his or her sentence, including any parole term.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 259, p. 783;

R.S.1913, § 8913;

C.S.1922, § 9934;

C.S.1929, § 29-113;

R.S.1943, § 29-113;

Laws 1951, c. 86, § 2, p. 249;

Laws 1969, c. 236, § 1, p. 871;

Laws 1993, LB 31, § 4;

Laws 2002, LB 1054, § 5;

Laws 2005, LB 53, § 2;

Laws 2024, LB20, § 2.